Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5074.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 16903. (1) An individual licensed under this part as a
marriage and family therapist shall use only the title "licensed
marriage and family therapist" or "licensed marriage counselor" or
the abbreviation "l.m.f.t." in representing his or her the
individual's services in the practice of marriage and family
EMR H02612'25 (H-2) 7g4vh6


therapy to the public.
(2) Unless exempt under section 16905(3), only an individual
licensed under this part may advertise that he or she the
individual offers marriage and family therapy; marriage or family
counseling service or advice; marriage or family guidance service
or advice; marriage or family relations service or advice; marriage
or family problems service or advice; marriage or family relations
advice or assistance; service in the alleviation of a marital or
family problem; or service of similar import or effect that is
included in the practice of marriage and family therapy.
(3) The board may grant a limited license to an individual who
has met the requirements of section 16909(a) 16909(1)(a) and (b) in
order to permit that individual to obtain the experience required
under section 16909(c). The 16909(1)(c). Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (6), the board shall not renew a limited
license for more than 6 years. A An individual who is granted a
limited licensee license under this subsection shall do all of the
following:
(a) Use only the title "limited licensed marriage and family
therapist" or "limited licensed marriage counselor".
(b) Not represent that he or she the individual is engaged in
the independent practice of marriage and family therapy.
(c) Practice only under the supervision of a fully licensed
marriage and family therapist.
(d) Confine his or her the individual's practice to an
organized health care setting or other arrangement approved by the
board.
(4) An individual engaged in obtaining experience required
under section 16909(b) 16909(1)(b) may use the title "marriage and
EMR H02612'25 (H-2) 7g4vh6


family therapist intern" or "marriage and family therapist trainee"
during the training period. The board shall not require an
individual obtaining experience required under section 16909(b)
16909(1)(b) to hold a limited license.
(5) The following words, titles, or letters or a combination
thereof, with or without qualifying words or phrases, are
restricted in use only to those individuals authorized under this
part to use the terms and in a way prescribed by this part:
"marriage advisor" or "marriage consultant"; "family counselor",
"family advisor", "family therapist", or "family consultant";
"family guidance counselor", "family guidance advisor", or "family
guidance consultant"; "marriage guidance counselor", "marriage
guidance advisor", or "marriage guidance consultant"; "family
relations counselor"; "marriage relations counselor", "marriage
relations advisor", or "marriage relations consultant"; or "marital
counselor" or "marital therapist".
(6) By not later than 5 years after the effective date of the
amendatory act that added this subsection, the department shall
promulgate rules under section 16194 to prescribe a 3-year license
cycle for a limited license granted under subsection (3), which may
be renewed for 1 additional 3-year term.
Sec. 18111. (1) Subject to subsection (3), the department may
grant a limited license to an individual who meets both of the
following criteria:
(a) Is not less than 18 years of age.
(b) Has received, from an accredited college or university
approved by the department, a master's or doctoral degree in
counseling from a qualified program, or a degree determined by the
department in consultation with the board to be substantially
EMR H02612'25 (H-2) 7g4vh6


equivalent to a counseling degree from a qualified program. The
department in consultation with the board shall promulgate rules to
establish standards to approve qualified programs.
(2) A limited license granted under this section must require
that the individual confine his or her the individual's practice to
a program of counseling experience under the supervision of a
licensed professional counselor.
(3) The department in consultation with the board shall
promulgate rules under section 16145 as necessary or appropriate to
supplement the requirements for licensure under this part as a
limited licensed counselor, including adopting updated standards of
the Council for the Accreditation of Counseling and Related
Educational Programs or a successor organization.
(4) By not later than 5 years after the effective date of the
amendatory act that added this subsection, the department shall
promulgate rules under section 16194 to prescribe a 3-year license
cycle for a limited license granted under this section, which may
be renewed for 1 additional 3-year term.
Sec. 18223. (1) The department, in consultation with the
board, shall promulgate rules requiring that to be granted a
license under this part, except as provided in subsection (2), an
individual must meet both of the following requirements:
(a) Have been granted a doctoral degree in psychology, or a
doctoral degree in a closely related field, from a doctoral degree
program that meets all of the following requirements:
(i) Is offered by a regionally accredited or other college,
university, or institution approved by the board, and includes
education and training appropriate to the practice of psychology.
(ii) Has obtained the Association of State and Provincial
EMR H02612'25 (H-2) 7g4vh6


Psychology Boards' national register designation, has been
accredited by the American Psychological Association or the
Canadian Psychological Association, or has obtained a similar
designation from or been accredited by an entity approved by the
board. However, a program that is in the process of obtaining the
designation or becoming accredited as required in this subparagraph
before August 1, 2011, and that obtains the designation or becomes
accredited on or before August 31, 2020, meets the requirements of
this subparagraph.
(b) Have not less than 1 year of postdoctoral experience in
the practice of psychology in an organized health care setting or
other arrangement, as established by the board.
(2) In addition to section 16182, the board shall grant a
limited license to an individual granted a master's degree in
psychology from a regionally accredited college, or university, or
institution approved by the board, if the individual has education,
training, and experience appropriate to the practice of psychology,
as established by the board. An individual who applies for an
initial limited license under this subsection before March 31, 2018
is not required to take an examination that is approved by the
board to be granted a limited license under this part if the
individual was granted a master's degree in psychology after
January 1, 2007 but before June 30, 2010 from the college,
university, or institution described in this subsection, the
individual has continuously held the temporary license described in
this section since it was initially granted by the board, and the
disciplinary subcommittee has not imposed a sanction against the
individual while holding the temporary license described in this
section. Except for duties performed as an employee of a
EMR H02612'25 (H-2) 7g4vh6


governmental entity or of a nonprofit organization serving
benevolent and charitable purposes, the board shall place 2
limitations on a license granted to an individual under this
subsection. The limitations must require supervision by a
psychologist who has a license other than a limited license and
must prohibit advertising or other representation to the public
that will lead the public to believe the individual is engaging in
the practice of psychology. A limited license granted under this
subsection is renewable under part 161. An individual who is
applying for a limited license under this subsection must have 1
year of supervised postgraduate experience in an organized health
care setting or other arrangement, as established by the board. The
individual must be supervised by a psychologist who has a license
other than a limited license, or if a psychologist who has a
license other than a limited license is not available, by a
psychologist who has at least a master's degree in psychology and
at least 3 years of experience in the practice of psychology or by
any other individual approved by the board.
(3) The board shall grant a temporary license to an individual
described in subsection (2) for the purpose of obtaining the 1 year
of postgraduate experience described in that subsection. Beginning
on March 31, 2018, a Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(5), a temporary license granted under this subsection is valid for
24 months and may be renewed for 1 additional 24-month term. If
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5), if an individual
described in subsection (2) was granted a temporary license by the
board before March 31, 2018, his or her the individual's temporary
license may be renewed for 1 additional 24-month term.
(4) The board shall grant a temporary license to an individual
EMR H02612'25 (H-2) 7g4vh6


who is enrolled in a doctoral degree program that meets the
requirements of subsection (1). Beginning on March 31, 2018, a
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5), a temporary license
granted under this subsection is valid for 24 months and may be
renewed for 3 additional 24-month terms. If Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (5), if an individual enrolled in a doctoral
program that meets the requirements of subsection (1) was granted a
temporary license by the board before March 31, 2018, his or her
the individual's temporary license may be renewed for 3 additional
24-month terms.
(5) By not later than 5 years after the effective date of the
amendatory act that added this subsection, the department shall
promulgate rules under section 16194 to prescribe the following
license cycles:
(a) For a license granted under subsection (1) or (2), a 3-
year license cycle, which license is renewable under part 161.
(b) For a license granted under subsection (3), a 3-year
license cycle, which license is renewable for 1 additional 3-year
term.
(c) For a license granted under subsection (4), a 3-year
license cycle, which license is renewable for 2 additional 3-year
terms.
Sec. 18233. (1) In addition to the requirements of part 161,
the board may require a licensee seeking renewal of a license to
furnish the board with satisfactory evidence that during the 2
years license cycle immediately preceding application for renewal
the licensee has attended continuing education courses or programs
approved by the board totaling not less than a number of hours
established by rule of the board in subjects related to the
EMR H02612'25 (H-2) 7g4vh6


practice of psychology and designed to further educate licensees.
(2) As required under section 16204, the board shall
promulgate rules requiring each applicant for license renewal to
complete as part of the continuing education requirement of
subsection (1) an appropriate number of hours or courses in pain
and symptom management.
Sec. 18509. (1) Except as otherwise provided in section 18515,
an individual granted a license under this part shall meet the
following requirements:
(a) A licensed bachelor's social worker shall have been
awarded a bachelor's degree in social work from a college or
university social work program approved by the board and shall have
completed at least 2 years of full-time postbachelor's degree
experience, or the equivalent in part-time hours, in the practice
of social work at the bachelor's level under the supervision of a
licensed master's social worker. Until July 1, 2008, the required
experience in the practice of social work at the bachelor's level
shall be performed under the supervision of a person who has been
awarded a master's or doctoral degree in social work from a college
or university school of social work.
(b) A licensed master's social worker shall have been awarded
a master's or doctoral degree in the field of social work from a
college or university social work program approved by the board and
shall have completed at least 2 years of full-time postmaster's or
postdoctoral degree experience, or the equivalent in part-time
hours, in the practice of social work at the master's level under
the supervision of a licensed master's social worker. Until July 1,
2008, the required experience in the practice of social work at the
master's level shall be performed under the supervision of a person
EMR H02612'25 (H-2) 7g4vh6


who has been awarded a master's or doctoral degree in the field of
social work from a college or university school of social work and
has engaged in the practice of social work for not less than 2
years. In addition to the requirements set forth in this
subdivision, a licensed master's social worker employed by a school
district shall meet the requirements for employment as a school
social worker contained in the revised school code, 1976 PA 451,
MCL 380.1 to 380.1852, and the rules promulgated under that act.
(2) The board may grant a limited license to engage in the 2-
year postdegree experience required under subsection (1) to an
individual who has completed all the educational requirements for
licensure as a bachelor's social worker or a master's social
worker. A Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), a limited
license granted under this subsection is renewable for not more
than 6 years.
(3) By not later than 5 years after the effective date of the
amendatory act that added this subsection, the department shall
promulgate rules under section 16194 to prescribe a 3-year license
cycle for a limited license granted under subsection (2), which may
be renewed for 1 additional 3-year term.
Final Page
EMR H02612'25 (H-2) 7g4vh6